Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.550

Use and admission fees and charges.

A park and recreation service area may impose and collect use fees or other direct charges on facilities financed, acquired, and operated by the park and recreation service area. The county legislative authority may allow admission fees or other direct charges which are paid by persons using county park facilities located within a park and recreation service area to be transferred to a park and recreation service area. Such direct charges to users may be made for the use of or admission to swimming pools, field houses, tennis and handball courts, bathhouses, swimming beaches, boat launching, storage or moorage facilities, ski lifts, picnic areas and other similar recreation facilities, and for parking lots used in conjunction with such facilities. All funds collected under the provisions of this section shall be deposited to the fund of the service area established in the office of the county treasurer, to be disbursed under the service area budget as approved by the governing body of the park and recreation service area.

[ 1988 c 82 s 3; 1981 c 210 s 13; 1963 c 218 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.